New Jersey, session 222, A761.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1955, c.257 (C.43:15A-97) is amended to read as follows: 1.    "Law enforcement officer" shall mean any permanent and full-time employee of the State of New Jersey holding one of the following titles:  motor vehicles officer, motor vehicles sergeant, motor vehicles lieutenant, motor vehicles captain, assistant chief, bureau of enforcement, and chief, bureau of enforcement in the Division of Motor Vehicles, and highway patrol officer, sergeant highway patrol bureau, lieutenant highway patrol bureau, captain highway patrol bureau, assistant chief highway patrol bureau, chief highway patrol bureau in the Division of State Police, and inspector, investigator, and administrative inspector in the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control, and inspector recruit alcoholic beverage control, inspector alcoholic beverage control, senior inspector alcoholic beverage control, principal inspector alcoholic beverage control, supervising inspector alcoholic beverage control in the Division of State Police, and conservation police officer, assistant district conservation police officer and district conservation police officer in the Division of Fish and Wildlife in the Department of Environmental Protection, and assistant chief marine police and senior marine patrolman in the Division of Resource Development, and marine police officer, senior marine police officer, principal marine police officer in the Division of State Police, and inspector, officer, senior inspector, and principal inspector in the Division of Shell Fisheries, any permanent and full-time active county detective, lieutenant of county detectives, captain of county detectives, chief of county detectives, and county investigator in the offices of the county prosecutors, and sheriff's officer, sergeant sheriff's officer, lieutenant sheriff's officer, captain sheriff's officer, chief sheriff's officer, and sheriff's investigator in the offices of the county sheriffs, and any patrolman or other police officer of the Board of Commissioners of the Palisades Interstate Park appointed pursuant to R.S.32:14-21.  The term shall also mean any permanent and full-time campus police officer appointed pursuant to P.L.1970, c.211 (C.18A:6-4.2 et seq.) who does not meet the age or medical requirements for enrollment in the Police and Firemens Retirement System established pursuant to P.L.1944, c.255 (C.43:16A-2 et seq.). If the Prison Officers' Pension Fund is terminated as provided in section 10 hereof, "law enforcement officer" shall also mean any permanent and full-time active employee of the State of New Jersey holding the title of correction officer, correction sergeant, correction lieutenant, correction captain or deputy keeper in the Division of Correction and Parole, or any member of the Prison Officers' Pension Fund on the date of such termination. (cf: P.L.2019, c.407, s.20) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.